Colorado, session 2026A, SB148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The Colorado Clean Energy Fund was established as the result
of a multiyear initiative led by the Colorado energy office in partnership
with the United States department of energy to identify strategies for
addressing clean energy financing gaps across the state. The effort
concluded with a formal recommendation that Colorado create an
independent, mission-driven financial institution capable of supporting
state energy policy objectives and mobilizing private capital.
(b) Acting on this recommendation, the Colorado energy office,
working closely with the governor's office, incorporated and publicly
announced the Colorado Clean Energy Fund in December 2018 as
Colorado's designated "green bank". From its inception, the Colorado
Clean Energy Fund has been structured to advance state priorities while
operating independently as a nonprofit lender, consistent with national
-2- SB26-148

green bank models.
(c) The general assembly subsequently provided direct
capitalization through Senate Bill 21-230, enacted in 2021, reinforcing
the state's commitment to a green bank model and its role in advancing
statutory clean energy, decarbonization, and economic development
goals. The Colorado Clean Energy Fund continues to maintain a formal
connection to the state through its board of directors, which includes an
ex officio seat held by the director of the Colorado energy office.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 6 to article
38.5 of title 24 as follows:
PART 6
UTILITY ON-BILL REPAYMENT PROGRAM
24-38.5-601. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND IS A COLORADO-BASED
NONPROFIT FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT SERVES AS THE STATE'S GREEN
BANK. THE MISSION OF THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND IS TO
ACCELERATE AFFORDABLE ACCESS TO CLEAN ENERGY AND ENERGY
EFFICIENCY MEASURES THROUGH INNOVATIVE FINANCING MECHANISMS.
(b) THE UTILITY ON-BILL REPAYMENT PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY
THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND ENABLES HOUSEHOLDS AND SMALL
BUSINESSES TO INVEST IN ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURES,
ELECTRIFICATION MEASURES, AND ENERGY UPGRADES WITH NO UPFRONT
COSTS, WITH COSTS THAT ARE INSTEAD REPAID THROUGH UTILITY BILLS,
THEREBY REDUCING ENERGY COST BURDENS, REDUCING POLLUTION, AND
IMPROVING HOUSING RESILIENCE;
(c) THE PROGRAM EMPLOYS INDUSTRY-LEADING BEST PRACTICES
-3- SB26-148

AND HAS DEMONSTRATED MEASURABLE SUCCESS IN REDUCING ENERGY
CONSUMPTION, IMPROVING AFFORDABILITY, AND LEVERAGING PRIVATE
CAPITAL FOR PUBLIC BENEFIT;
(d) EXPANDING ACCESS TO THE PROGRAM ADVANCES THE PUBLIC
INTEREST BY REDUCING ENERGY COST BURDENS, IMPROVING HOUSING
RESILIENCE, REDUCING POLLUTION, AND SUPPORTING COLORADO'S
CLIMATE GOALS;
(e) THE PROGRAM SERVES A PUBLIC PURPOSE AND IS ELIGIBLE TO
RECEIVE FINANCIAL SUPPORT FROM THE UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST
FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 38-13-801 IF THIS FINANCIAL SUPPORT DOES
NOT IMPAIR THE ABILITY OF THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE UNCLAIMED
PROPERTY TRUST FUND TO PAY RIGHTFUL CLAIMS;
(f) A LOW-INTEREST LOAN TO THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY
FUND, SERVING AS A MISSION-ALIGNED GREEN BANK, WILL CATALYZE
PRIVATE INVESTMENT, ACCELERATE UTILITY ADOPTION OF THE PROGRAM,
AND ENSURE FISCAL STEWARDSHIP THROUGH REPAYMENT AND
REINVESTMENT; AND
(g) EXPANDING ACCESS TO THE PROGRAM IS EXPECTED TO
GENERATE ECONOMIC BENEFITS THROUGHOUT COLORADO BY SUPPORTING
LOCAL CONTRACTORS AND SMALL BUSINESSES, REDUCING ENERGY COSTS
FOR HOUSEHOLDS AND BUSINESSES, AND KEEPING MORE ENERGY DOLLARS
IN LOCAL COMMUNITIES. INVESTMENTS IN ENERGY EFFICIENCY,
ELECTRIFICATION, AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS CAN STIMULATE PRIVATE
CAPITAL, CREATE WELL-PAYING JOBS IN CONSTRUCTION AND ENERGY
SERVICES, AND IMPROVE THE COMPETITIVENESS OF COLORADO
BUSINESSES.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER DECLARES THAT THE LOAN
-4- SB26-148

AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 38-13-801 (7)(a) IS CONSIDERED A STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT IN COLORADO'S CLEAN ENERGY INFRASTRUCTURE, ECONOMIC
RESILIENCE, AND REDUCTION OF ENERGY BURDENS.
24-38.5-602. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 6, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
CREATED IN SECTION 40-2-101.
(2) "INCOME-QUALIFIED UTILITY CUSTOMER" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN SECTION 40-3-106 (1)(d)(II).
(3) "OFFICE" MEANS THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE CREATED IN
SECTION 24-38.5-101 (1).
(4) "PARTICIPATING UTILITY" MEANS A UTILITY THAT ELECTS TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM AND CONTRACTS WITH THE COLORADO
CLEAN ENERGY FUND TO RECEIVE MONEY THROUGH THE PROGRAM.
(5) "PROGRAM" MEANS THE TARIFF-BASED ON-BILL REPAYMENT
PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND AND
REVIEWED BY THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38.5-603 (2).
(6) "PROGRAM PARTICIPANT" MEANS A UTILITY CUSTOMER THAT
REQUESTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM AND THAT THE RELEVANT
PARTICIPATING UTILITY, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE COLORADO CLEAN
ENERGY FUND, DETERMINES IS ELIGIBLE FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPATION.
(7) "UTILITY" MEANS AN ELECTRIC UTILITY, A GAS UTILITY, OR A
COMBINED FUEL UTILITY AND INCLUDES:
(a) AN INVESTOR-OWNED UTILITY;
(b) A COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION; AND
(c) A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY.
-5- SB26-148

24-38.5-603. On-bill repayment program - tariff-based
programs - required disclosures - transfers of financial responsibility
- utility loss reserve - interest rates - income-qualified pathway -
shutoff for nonpayment.
(1) On-bill repayment obligations. THE COLORADO CLEAN
ENERGY FUND'S ON-BILL REPAYMENT PROGRAM MUST REQUIRE THAT A
REPAYMENT OBLIGATION MUST:
(a) BE ASSIGNED TO THE METERED UTILITY SERVICE AND NOT TO
AN INDIVIDUAL CUSTOMER;
(b) BE ATTACHED TO THE METERED UTILITY SERVICE AND NOT
CONSTITUTE A LIEN ON REAL PROPERTY; AND
(c) TRANSFER WITH THE METERED UTILITY SERVICE UPON
TRANSFER OF REAL PROPERTY OWNERSHIP OR OCCUPANCY, UNLESS THE
ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION IS SATISFIED IN FULL AT OR PRIOR TO
THE TIME OF TRANSFER.
(2) On-bill repayment program design and review.
(a) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2026, THE OFFICE SHALL REVIEW THE
INITIAL DESIGN OF THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND'S ON-BILL
REPAYMENT PROGRAM AND ANY MATERIAL MODIFICATIONS TO THE
PROGRAM DEVELOPED BY THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND AND
NOTIFY THE STATE TREASURER AS TO WHETHER THE PROGRAM GUIDANCE
ALIGNS WITH THE STATEWIDE EMISSION REDUCTION GOALS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 25-7-102 (2)(g).
(b) THE OFFICE MAY, PERIODICALLY THROUGHOUT THE DURATION
OF THE PROGRAM AND IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COLORADO CLEAN
ENERGY FUND, REQUEST THAT THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND
MAKE REASONABLE MODIFICATIONS TO THE PROGRAM DESIGN AS
-6- SB26-148

NECESSARY TO ENSURE CONSISTENCY WITH THIS PART 6, ALIGNMENT WITH
THE STATEWIDE EMISSION REDUCTION GOALS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
25-7-102 (2)(g), AND THE PRACTICAL FEASIBILITY OF PROGRAM
ADMINISTRATION AND MARKET PARTICIPATION.
(c) SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT WAIVE OR
ALTER THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSION TO REGULATE A
PARTICIPATING UTILITY THAT IS SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE
COMMISSION PURSUANT TO TITLE 40.
(3) Required disclosures.
(a) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND, ACTING AS THE
PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR, AND PARTICIPATING UTILITIES SHALL
DISCLOSE TO PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS THE RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES
OF PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS, INCLUDING DISCLOSURE OF:
(I) THE TARIFF STRUCTURE, ESTIMATED MONTHLY CHARGES, AND
ESTIMATED TERM OF THE REPAYMENT OBLIGATION;
(II) THE TRANSFERABILITY OF THE REPAYMENT OBLIGATION; AND
(III) CUSTOMER RIGHTS RELATED TO DISPUTES, HARDSHIP
ACCOMMODATIONS, AND SERVICE INTERRUPTION POLICIES.
(b) (I) IF A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN ON-BILL
REPAYMENT OBLIGATION IS LEASED TO A TENANT, THE LEASE AGREEMENT
MUST INCLUDE A WRITTEN DISCLOSURE STATING THAT THE RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO AN ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION
ASSOCIATED WITH THE METERED UTILITY SERVICE.
(II) AT THE TIME THE LEASE AGREEMENT IS EXECUTED, THE
DISCLOSURE REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b) MUST INCLUDE:
(A) A STATEMENT THAT THE ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION IS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE UTILITY METER SERVING THE RESIDENTIAL
-7- SB26-148

PROPERTY AND IS REPAID THROUGH CHARGES ON THE UTILITY BILL;
(B) THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF THE ON-BILL REPAYMENT
OBLIGATION; AND
(C) THE EXPECTED TERM OR REMAINING DURATION OF THE
ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION.
(III) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b) AFFECTS THE
ALLOCATION OF UTILITY COSTS BETWEEN A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY
OWNER AND A TENANT OR AUTHORIZES OR PROHIBITS THE RECOVERY OF
COSTS THROUGH RENT, UTILITY CHARGES, OR OTHER LEASE AGREEMENT
TERMS.
(IV) FAILURE TO PROVIDE THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED BY THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(b) MAY BE CONSIDERED IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER
APPLICABLE LAW CONCERNING LANDLORDS AND TENANTS.
(4) Transfers of financial responsibility - notification required
- program administrator's obligation.
(a) IN A CONTRACT THAT THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND
ENTERS INTO WITH A PARTICIPATING UTILITY REGARDING THE USE OF
MONEY LOANED TO THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND PURSUANT TO
SECTION 38-13-801 (7)(a), THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) A REQUIREMENT THAT THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND,
ACTING AS THE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR, RECORD A NOTICE OF THE
ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION WITH THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER FOR INCLUSION IN THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF THE COUNTY IN
WHICH A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT'S PROPERTY IS LOCATED AGAINST THE
REAL PROPERTY TITLE. THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL
RECORD THE NOTICE WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE PROVISION OF
-8- SB26-148

FINANCING TO A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT AND INCLUDE IN THE NOTICE:
(A) A LEGAL DESCRIPTION OF THE REAL PROPERTY SUBJECT TO THE
FINANCING;
(B) A STATEMENT THAT THE FINANCING IS ATTACHED TO THE
METERED UTILITY SERVICE;
(C) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT;
(D) THE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT FINANCED;
(E) THE TERMS OF THE REPAYMENT OBLIGATION; AND
(F) A STATEMENT THAT THE REPAYMENT OBLIGATION DOES NOT
CONSTITUTE A LIEN ON THE REAL PROPERTY BUT IS INTENDED TO GIVE A
PURCHASER OF THE REAL PROPERTY NOTICE THAT THE REAL PROPERTY IS
SUBJECT TO AN ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION; AND
(II) A REQUIREMENT THAT THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND
SHALL, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE FINANCING HAS BEEN
COMPLETELY REPAID, FILE A NOTICE WITH THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER FOR INCLUSION IN THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE REAL PROPERTY IS LOCATED, INDICATING THAT THE FINANCING
REPAYMENT IS COMPLETE AND THAT THERE ARE NO FURTHER ON-BILL
REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE REAL PROPERTY.
(b) AT THE POINT OF SALE OR TRANSFER OF OCCUPANCY OF REAL
PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION, THE ON-BILL
REPAYMENT OBLIGATION MUST TRANSFER WITH THE METERED UTILITY
SERVICE UNLESS THE ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATION IS SATISFIED IN
FULL AT OR PRIOR TO THE TIME OF TRANSFER.
(c) A COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL RECORD A NOTICE
FILED BY THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (4) IN A MANNER THAT ENSURES THE NOTICE APPEARS IN A
-9- SB26-148

TITLE SEARCH OF THE REAL PROPERTY.
(5) Utility loss reserve requirement.
(a) AS A CONDITION OF PARTICIPATING IN THE COLORADO CLEAN
ENERGY FUND'S ON-BILL REPAYMENT PROGRAM AND RECEIVING MONEY
THROUGH THE PROGRAM, A PARTICIPATING UTILITY SHALL ESTABLISH OR
CAUSE TO BE ESTABLISHED A LOSS RESERVE OR OTHER CREDIT
ENHANCEMENT IN AN AMOUNT OF AT LEAST FIVE PERCENT OF THE
OUTSTANDING ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
UTILITY'S ON-BILL REPAYMENT PROGRAM.
(b) FOR A PARTICIPATING UTILITY SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE
COMMISSION, THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A LOSS RESERVE OR OTHER CREDIT
ENHANCEMENT IS SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION. AN
APPROVED REGULATORY ASSET FOR LOSSES ATTRIBUTABLE TO
NONPAYMENT OF ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS MAY SATISFY ALL OR
A PORTION OF THE LOSS RESERVE, SUBJECT TO COMMISSION APPROVAL.
THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE COST RECOVERY ASSOCIATED WITH AN
APPROVED LOSS RESERVE OR OTHER CREDIT ENHANCEMENT, CONSISTENT
WITH APPLICABLE LAW.
(c) FOR A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY OR COOPERATIVE
ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION THAT HAS VOTED TO EXEMPT ITSELF FROM
REGULATION BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 9.5 OF TITLE 40,
THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A LOSS RESERVE OR OTHER CREDIT ENHANCEMENT
IS SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY'S OR
COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION'S GOVERNING BODY, CONSISTENT
WITH APPLICABLE LAW AND GOVERNING DOCUMENTS.
(6) Interest rates - cost-reduction authority.
(a) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND, ACTING AS THE
-10- SB26-148

PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR, SHALL ESTABLISH INTEREST RATES FOR
ON-BILL REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS BASED ON PREVAILING MARKET
CONDITIONS AND PROGRAM OBJECTIVES AND SHALL DESIGN INTEREST
RATES TO BE MORE FAVORABLE THAN GENERALLY AVAILABLE MARKET
FINANCING FOR COMPARABLE FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS.
(b) A PARTICIPATING UTILITY MAY DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A
MECHANISM TO REDUCE INTEREST RATES IF THE MECHANISM IS
AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION OR GOVERNING BODY OF A
MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY OR COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION
THAT HAS VOTED TO EXEMPT ITSELF FROM REGULATION BY THE
COMMISSION PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 9.5 OF TITLE 40, AS APPLICABLE.
(7) Income-qualified pathway.
(a) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND, ACTING AS THE
PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR, SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A PATHWAY
FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM FOR INCOME-QUALIFIED UTILITY
CUSTOMERS. THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL REFER
INCOME-QUALIFIED UTILITY CUSTOMERS TO EXISTING STATE OR FEDERAL
ENERGY-ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS WHEN APPROPRIATE.
(b) THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE DUPLICATION OF EXISTING
INCOME-QUALIFIED SERVICES OR ELIGIBILITY PROCESSES.
(8) Shutoff for nonpayment.
(a) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ALTERS THE APPLICATION OF THE
FOLLOWING TO PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS, AS APPLICABLE:
(I) COMMISSION RULES AND UTILITY TARIFFS GOVERNING
DISCONTINUATION OF SERVICE, INCLUDING SHUTOFF PROTECTIONS FOR
FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AND SEVERE WEATHER; OR
(II) REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITIES OR
-11- SB26-148

COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATIONS THAT HAVE VOTED TO EXEMPT
THEMSELVES FROM REGULATION BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 9.5 OF TITLE 40 REGARDING HARDSHIP AND WEATHER-RELATED
SHUTOFF PROTECTIONS.
(b) CONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION (8)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND
OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, A UTILITY MAY DISCONTINUE SERVICE FOR
NONPAYMENT OF AN ON-BILL REPAYMENT CHARGE IF THE CHARGE IS MORE
THAN NINETY DAYS PAST DUE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-13-801, amend
(1)(b); and add (7) as follows:
38-13-801. Unclaimed property trust fund - creation -
payments - interest - appropriations - records - rules - definitions -
repeal.
(1) (b) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (3.5), AND
(7) of this section, the principal of the trust fund shall not be expended
except to pay claims made pursuant to this article 13. Money constituting
the principal of the trust fund is not fiscal year spending of the state for
purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution and is not
subject to appropriation by the general assembly.
(7) (a) (I) AFTER RESERVING THE AMOUNTS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION AND TRANSMITTING THE MONEY
NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, ON AUGUST 15, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL EXECUTE A
LOAN AGREEMENT WITH THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND, A
NONPROFIT FINANCIAL INSTITUTION WITH EXPERIENCE ADMINISTERING
CLEAN ENERGY FINANCING PROGRAMS. THE LOAN AGREEMENT MUST
REQUIRE THE STATE TREASURER TO MAKE A LOW-INTEREST LOAN IN THE
-12- SB26-148

AMOUNT OF FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE UNCLAIMED PROPERTY
TRUST FUND TO THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND, SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION (7), FOR THE PURPOSE OF
CAPITALIZING AND EXPANDING THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND'S
ON-BILL REPAYMENT PROGRAM AND ACCELERATING STATEWIDE UTILITY
ADOPTION OF THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL EXECUTE THE LOAN AGREEMENT
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION AFTER:
(A) THE STATE TREASURER CERTIFIES THAT THE LOAN WILL NOT
IMPAIR THE UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND'S ABILITY TO PAY CLAIMS;
(B) THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE NOTIFIES THE STATE
TREASURER THAT THE PROGRAM GUIDANCE ALIGNS WITH THE STATEWIDE
EMISSION REDUCTION GOALS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-7-102 (2)(g),
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38.5-603 (2)(a); AND
(C) THE STATE TREASURER CERTIFIES THAT THE LOAN AGREEMENT
DETAILS REPAYMENT TERMS, REPORTING REQUIREMENTS, AND
PERFORMANCE METRICS.
(III) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND MAY DRAW THE LOAN
IN FIVE ADVANCES OF TEN MILLION DOLLARS EACH, INCLUDING AN INITIAL
ADVANCE ON AUGUST 15, 2026, AND, AFTER CERTIFICATION BY THE
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND THAT NOT LESS THAN EIGHTY PERCENT
OF THE AMOUNT PREVIOUSLY ADVANCED HAS BEEN COMMITTED OR
ENCUMBERED FOR ELIGIBLE PROGRAM PURPOSES, SUBSEQUENT ADVANCES.
(IV) AMOUNTS ADVANCED UNDER THE LOAN BEAR INTEREST AT
A RATE NEGOTIATED BETWEEN THE STATE TREASURER AND THE
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND, NOT TO EXCEED TWO PERCENT
ANNUALLY. INTEREST ACCRUES ONLY ON THE OUTSTANDING PRINCIPAL
-13- SB26-148

BALANCE ADVANCED BY THE STATE TREASURER UNDER THE LOAN.
(V) DURING THE FIRST SIX YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL
DRAW, THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL MAKE
INTEREST-ONLY PAYMENTS TO THE STATE TREASURER IN REPAYMENT OF
THE LOAN, AND THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE PAYMENTS TO
THE UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND. BEGINNING IN THE SEVENTH
YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL DRAW AND CONTINUING THROUGH
THE TWENTIETH YEAR, THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL
MAKE ANNUAL PRINCIPAL PAYMENTS EQUAL TO TWO PERCENT OF THE
ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL AMOUNT, IN ADDITION TO REQUIRED INTEREST
PAYMENTS, TO THE STATE TREASURER. ANY REMAINING OUTSTANDING
PRINCIPAL AND ACCRUED INTEREST IS DUE AND PAYABLE IN FULL BY THE
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND AT MATURITY.
(VI) THE MAXIMUM TERM OF THE LOAN IS TWENTY YEARS FROM
THE DATE OF THE FIRST DRAW. THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND
MAY MAKE PRINCIPAL REPAYMENTS TO THE STATE TREASURER AT ANY
TIME WITHOUT PENALTY IF THE TOTAL OUTSTANDING PRINCIPAL OF THE
LOAN DOES NOT EXCEED THE AUTHORIZED CAP OF FIFTY MILLION
DOLLARS.
(VII) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL PAY THE LOAN
BACK TO THE STATE TREASURER BEFORE AUGUST 15, 2046.
(b) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION (7) PROHIBITS THE COLORADO
CLEAN ENERGY FUND FROM SELLING, ASSIGNING, OR OTHERWISE
TRANSFERRING PROGRAM RECEIVABLES OR PORTIONS OF THE PROGRAM'S
PORTFOLIO TO THIRD PARTIES OR SECONDARY MARKET INVESTORS IF
DOING SO DOES NOT IMPAIR REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS OWED TO THE
STATE TREASURER.
-14- SB26-148

(c) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 15, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EVERY
FEBRUARY 15 THEREAFTER THROUGH FEBRUARY 15, 2046, THE
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY FUND SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO
THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE, AND THE
STATE TREASURER DETAILING:
(I) FINANCIAL DISBURSEMENTS AND REPAYMENTS;
(II) PROGRAM DEPLOYMENT METRICS, INCLUDING HOUSEHOLDS
SERVED AND ENERGY SAVINGS ACHIEVED; AND
(III) LEVERAGED PRIVATE CAPITAL AND COMMUNITY IMPACT.
(d) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7), "PROGRAM" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 24-38.5-602 (5).
(e) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1,
2046.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-15- SB26-148